tests/runtime/among.sbl
// Test among.

externals (stem)

routines (gate bgate bgate2 not_atlimit)

stringescapes {}

define gate as 'q'

backwardmode (
  define bgate as 'q'
  define bgate2 as test hop 4
  define not_atlimit as not atlimit
)

define stem as (
  not (
    among (
      'x' ()
      '' gate ()
    )
    ='gated default among case did not fail as expected'
  )

  // Regression test for bug during development of new C among code.
  not (
    backwards among (
      'a' bgate
      'bc' bgate
    )
    ='gated among did not fail as expected'
  )

  // Regression test for bug during development of new C among code.
  test (
    ='jalovc'
    backwards (
      [substring] among (
        // -c -> -k
        'c'
          (<- 'k')
        'nc'
        'avc'
        'ovc'
          ()
        'xnc'
          (<- 'xnk')
      )
    )
    ('jalovc' atlimit) or fail='empty among action mishandled'
  )

  ='hum'
  // Regression test for bug during development of C new among code.
  // Generated C code triggered "c0 set but not used" warning.
  not backwards (
    [substring] among (
      'am'
        (delete)
      'em' bgate  'iem' bgate
        (delete)
    )
    ='gated among with top-level segment did not fail as expected'
  )

  // Regression test for bug during development of C new among code.
  ='aaronem'
  backwards (
    [substring] among (
      'axxem' 'am'
      'em' not_atlimit  'iem' not_atlimit
        (delete)
    )
  ) or fail='gated among did not match aaronem'
  test ('aaron' atlimit) or fail='gated among did not stem aaronem'

  // Regression test for bug during development of C new among code.
  ='aaronem'
  backwards (
    [substring] among (
      'axxem' 'am'
      'em' not_atlimit  'iem' not_atlimit
    )
    delete
  ) or fail='gated among did not match aaronem (2)'
  test ('aaron' atlimit) or fail='gated among did not stem aaronem (2)'

  // Regression test for bug during development of C new among code.
  // This triggered malloc heap corruption during compilation.
  ='miami'
  backwards (
    [substring] among (
      'i' bgate2
      'ami' bgate2  'iami' bgate2
        (delete)
    )
  ) or fail='gated among did not match origami'
  test ('miam' atlimit) or fail='among chained functions not handled'

  // Regression test for bug in C new among code on big-endian platforms.
  ='youthfulness'
  // Failed to match big-endian platforms.
  backwards (
    [substring] among (
      'fulness' (<-'ful')
      'ousness' (<-'ous')
    )
  ) or fail='big-endian among regression test failed to match'
  test ('youthful' atlimit) or fail='big-endian among regression test output wrong'

  ='ok'
)
